Arkansas, session 2025, HB1719.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-17-122, concerning optional paid
maternity leave policies at public school districts and open-enrollment
public charter schools, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as
follows:
(d)(1)(A) Any holiday or other day during a contract year designated by
a school as a day on which academic classes will not be held shall not be
counted towards the total number of days the school approves as maternity
leave for an individual eligible for paid maternity leave.
(B) If a day approved as maternity leave for an individual
eligible for paid maternity leave occurs on an unpaid contract day under the
individual's current contract, the day approved as maternity leave shall
qualify for paid maternity leave.
(2) As used in subdivision (d)(1) of this section, "school"
means a public school district, an open-enrollment public charter school, or
a private school that offers maternity leave either under this section or
*TNL260*
04-07-2025 10:41:47 TNL260

As Engrossed: H4/7/25 HB1719
otherwise as provided by school policy.

/s/Vaught

































04-07-2025 10:41:47 TNL260